Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,132
Nail technician or instructor; reciprocity; requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) The department may grant a license based on licensure in another jurisdiction to a nail technician or nail technology instructor who presents proof of the following:

(a) He or she has attained the age of seventeen years;

(b) He or she has completed formal education equivalent to a United States high school education;

(c) He or she is currently licensed as a nail technician or its equivalent or as a nail technology instructor or its equivalent in another jurisdiction and he or she has never been disciplined or had his or her license revoked;

(d) For licensure as a nail technician, evidence of completion of a program of nail technician studies consisting of three hundred hours and successful passage of a written examination. If a written examination was not required for licensure in another jurisdiction, the applicant must take the Nebraska written examination. Each month of full-time practice as a nail technician within the five years immediately preceding application shall be valued as equivalent to one hundred hours toward a nail technician license; and

(e) For licensure as a nail technology instructor, evidence of completion of a program of studies consisting of three hundred hours beyond the program of studies required for licensure in another jurisdiction as a nail technician, successful passage of a written examination, and current licensure as a nail technician in Nebraska as evidenced by possessing a valid Nebraska nail technician license. If a written examination was not required for licensure as a nail technology instructor, the applicant must take the Nebraska written examination. Each month of full-time practice as a nail technology instructor within the five years immediately preceding application shall be valued as equivalent to one hundred hours toward a nail technology instructor license.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 39;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,191;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 394;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 46;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 48.